California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no lien provided by this section for storage or service provided upon the request of any person other than the legal owner as shown on the registration certificate of the vessel shall be valid against the interest of the legal owner to the extent that the lien exceeds one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) unless the person performing the storage or service obtains the consent of the legal owner to the amount of the excess. The legal owner may limit his or her consent to a specified dollar amount or period of time. The lien claimant shall give actual notice in writing, prior to exceeding that amount, either by personal service or by registered mail to the legal and registered owner or owners as named and at the addresses as shown on the registration certificate, on a standard form provided by the department, containing a description of the storage or services, or both, a description and registration number of the vessel, the name of the registered owner or owners, the dollar amount or rate of the charges for the storage or services, and a statement in boldface type that, with respect to storage charges, consent of the legal owner shall be presumed unless the legal owner notifies the lien claimant within 15 days of receipt of the request for consent that he or she declines to consent to the storage. The lien claimant shall notify the legal owner as shown on the registration certificate of the vessel, by certified mail, that the vessel is subject to sale pursuant to the California Boater’s Lien Law and that the lien claimed exceeds one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), any claim for the cost of services may exceed the estimate given therefor by an amount not in excess of 10 percent thereof and the lien of the lien claimant shall be valid against the legal owner to the full amount of such excess to the same extent as would be a lien for the original estimate.

(d) With respect to claims for storage charges, a legal owner shall be presumed to consent to storage charges if he or she fails to respond to the request for consent set forth in subdivision (b) within 15 days after receipt thereof, such response to be addressed to the lien claimant at the address stated in the request for consent. In addition, consent in all cases is presumed for the 30-day period immediately following the giving of the request for consent notice.

(e) The legal owner may, upon declining consent, remove the vessel from the lien claimant only upon satisfying the lien of the lien claimant.

(f) Any lien arising under this section shall be extinguished, and no lien sale shall be conducted unless, 60 days after the lien arises, the lienholder does either of the following:

(1) Applies to the department for an authorization to conduct a lien sale.

(2) Files an action on the claim in court.

(g) Nothing in this section shall impair any rights or remedies which are otherwise available to the lien claimant against the registered owner under any other provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 745, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

503.

(a) A lienholder shall apply to the department for the issuance of an authorization to conduct a lien sale pursuant to the provisions of this section for any vessel with a value determined to be over one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500). A fee shall be charged by the department and may be recovered by the lienholder if a lien sale is conducted or if the vessel is redeemed. The application shall be executed under penalty of perjury and shall include all of the following information:

(1) A description of the vessel, including make, hull identification number, and state of registration, to the extent available.

(2) The names and addresses of the registered and legal owners of the vessel, if ascertainable from the registration certificate within the vessel, and the name and address of any person whom the lienholder knows or reasonably should know claims a proprietary interest in the vessel.

(3) A statement of the amount of the lien and the facts which give rise to the lien. The statement shall include, as a separate item, an estimate of any additional storage costs accruing pending the lien sale.

(b) Upon receipt of an application made pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall within 15 days thereafter do the following:

(1) Notify the vessel registry agency of a foreign state of the pending lien sale, if the vessel bears indicia of registration in that state.

(2) By mail, send a notice, a copy of the application, and a return envelope preaddressed to the department to the registered and legal owners at their addresses of record with the department, and to any other person whose name and address is listed in the application.

(3) A vessel registration stop order or title transfer stop order shall be applied by the department at the time the lien claimant requests authorization to conduct the sale.

(4) Notify the applicant of any outstanding property tax lien on the vessel of which the department has been notified pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3205 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The notice required by this paragraph shall identify the county in which any outstanding lien is held.

(c) The notice required pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include all of the following statements:

(1) An application has been made with the department for authorization to conduct a lien sale and the department has placed a vessel registration stop order or title transfer stop order on the vessel.

(2) Each person to whom notice is sent pursuant to subdivision (b) is entitled to a hearing in court if that person so desires.

(3) If a hearing in court is desired, a declaration of opposition, signed under penalty of perjury, is required to be signed and returned to the department within 15 days of the date that the notice required pursuant to subdivision (b) was mailed.

(4) If the declaration of opposition is signed and returned to the department, the lienholder will be allowed to sell the vessel only if he or she obtains a court judgment or a subsequent release from the declarant.

(5) If a court action is filed, the declarant will be served by mail with legal process in the court proceedings at the address shown on the declaration of opposition and may appear to contest the claim.

(6) The person may be liable for court costs if a judgment is entered in favor of the lienholder.

(d) If the department receives the declaration of opposition in the time provided, the department shall notify the lienholder within 16 days of the receipt of the declaration of opposition that a lien sale shall not be conducted unless the lienholder files an action in court within 60 days of the notice. A lien sale of the vessel shall not be conducted unless judgment is subsequently entered in favor of the lienholder or the declarant subsequently releases his or her interest in the vessel.

(e) Service of legal process on the declarant, with return receipt requested signed by the declarant or an authorized agent of the declarant at the address shown on the declaration of opposition, shall be effective. Return of a declaration of opposition shall constitute consent by the declarant to service of legal process for the desired court hearing upon him or her in the foregoing manner. Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 415.3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the lienholder has attempted service upon declarant by that method at the address shown on the declaration of opposition and the mail has been returned unclaimed, the department shall promptly authorize the sale.

(f) Upon receipt of authorization to conduct the lien sale, the lienholder shall do all of the following:

(1) At least 10 days, but not more than 30 days, prior to the lien sale, not counting the day of the sale, give notice of the sale by advertising once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the vessel is located. If there is no newspaper published in the county, notice shall be given by posting a notice of sale form in three of the most public places in the area in which the vessel is located and at the place where the vessel is to be sold for 10 consecutive days prior to and including the day of the sale.

(2) Send a notice of pending lien sale 20 days prior to the sale, but not counting the day of sale, by mail with return receipt requested, to each of the following:

(A) The registered and legal owners of the vessel, if registered in this state.

(B) All persons known to have an interest in the vessel.

(C) The department.

(g) Upon receipt of the notice, the department shall mark its records and thereafter notify any person having a proprietary interest in the vessel that there is a pending lien sale and that title will not be transferred until the lien is satisfied or released.

(h) All notices required by this section, including the notice forms prescribed by the department, shall specify the make, hull identification number, and state of registration, if available, and the specific date, exact time, and place of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 940, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 940.)
-------------------------------------------

504.

(a) For vessels with a value determined to be one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or less, the department shall promptly furnish the lienholder with the names and addresses of the registered and legal owners of record.

(b) The lienholder shall, immediately upon receipt of the names and addresses, send by mail, with return receipt requested, a completed notice of pending lien sale form, a blank declaration of opposition form, and a return envelope preaddressed to the department, to the registered owner and legal owner at their addresses of record with the department, to any other person known to have a proprietary interest in the vessel, and to the department.

(c) Upon receipt of the notice, the department shall mark its records and thereafter notify any person having a proprietary interest in the vessel that there is a pending lien sale and that title will not be transferred until the lien is satisfied or released.

(d) All notices shall be signed under penalty of perjury and shall include all of the following information and statements:

(1) A description of the vessel, including make, identification number, and state of registration, to the extent available.

(2) The specific date, exact time, and place of sale, which shall be set not less than 35 days, but not more than 60 days, from the date of mailing.

(3) The names and addresses of the registered and legal owners of the vessel and any other person known to have an interest in the vessel.

(4) All of the following statements:

(A) The amount of the lien and the facts that give rise to the lien. The statement shall include, as a separate item, an estimate of any additional storage costs accruing pending the lien sale.

(B) The person has a right to a hearing in court.

(C) If a court hearing is desired, a declaration of opposition signed under penalty of perjury is required to be signed and returned to the department within 15 days of the date the notice of pending lien sale was mailed.

(D) If the declaration of opposition is signed and returned, the lienholder will be allowed to sell the vessel only if he or she obtains a court judgment or if he or she obtains a subsequent release from the declarant.

(E) If a court action is filed, the declarant will be served by mail with legal process in the court proceedings at the address shown on the declaration of opposition and may appear to contest the claim.

(F) The person may be liable for court costs if a judgment is entered in favor of the lienholder.

(e) If the department receives the completed declaration of opposition within the time provided, the department shall notify the lienholder within 16 days that a lien sale shall not be conducted unless the lienholder files an action in court within 20 days of the notice and judgment is subsequently entered in favor of the lienholder or the declarant subsequently releases his or her interest in the vessel.

(f) Service on the declarant by mail with return receipt requested, signed by the declarant or an authorized agent of the declarant at the address shown on the declaration of opposition, shall be effective. Return of a declaration of opposition shall constitute consent by the declarant to service of legal process for the desired court hearing upon him or her in the foregoing manner. If the lienholder has attempted service upon the declarant by that method at the address shown on the declaration of opposition and the mail has been returned unclaimed, the lienholder may proceed with the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 344.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

505.

(a) A registered or legal owner of a vessel may release any interest in the vessel after the lien has arisen. The release shall be dated when signed and a copy shall be given at the time the release is signed to the person releasing the interest.

(b) The release shall be in at least 12-point type and shall contain all of the following information in simple, nontechnical language:

(1) A description of the vessel, including the make, the identification number, and the state of registration, to the extent available.

(2) The names and addresses of the registered and legal owners of record with the department, to the extent available.

(3) A statement of the amount of the lien and the facts which give rise to the lien.

(4) A statement that the person releasing the interest understands that (i) he or she has a legal right to a hearing in court prior to any sale of the vessel to satisfy the lien and (ii) he or she is giving up the right to appear to contest the claim of the lienholder.

(5) A statement that (i) the person releasing the interest gives up any interest he or she may have in the vessel and (ii) he or she is giving the lienholder permission to sell the vessel.

(c) The release required by this section shall be filed with the department in connection with any transfer of interest in a vessel following a lien sale.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 941, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

505.5.

(a) Whenever the lien upon any vessel is lost by reason of the loss of possession through trick, fraud, or device, the repossession of the vessel by the former lienholder claimant revives the lien, but a lien so revived is subordinate to any right, title, or interest of a person under a sale, transfer, encumbrance, lien, or other interest acquired or secured in good faith and for value between the time of the loss of possession and the time of repossession.

(b) It is a misdemeanor for a person to obtain possession of a vessel or any part of the vessel subject to a lien pursuant to the provisions of this chapter by trick, fraud, or device.

(c) It is a misdemeanor
 for a person claiming a lien on a vessel to knowingly violate this article.

(d) A person found guilty of a misdemeanor violation of subdivision (b) or (c)
 shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 29.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

506.

No lien sale shall be undertaken pursuant to Section 503 or 504 unless the vessel has been available for inspection at a location easily accessible to the public for at least one hour before the sale and is at the place of sale at the time and date specified on the notice of sale. Sealed bids shall not be accepted. The lienholder shall conduct the sale in a commercially reasonable manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 941, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

506.5.

Within 10 days after the sale of any vessel pursuant to the provisions of Section 503 or 504, the legal or registered owner may redeem the vessel upon the payment of the amount of the lien, all costs and expenses of the lien, together with interest on that sum at the legal rate from the due date thereof until the repayment. If the vessel is not redeemed, all lien sale documents required by the department to effect transfer of title shall then be completed and delivered to the buyer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 941, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

507.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), at the time a lienholder applies to the department to conduct a sale under Section 504, the lienholder shall submit with the application a declaration by a licensed yacht and ship broker of the fair market value of the described vessel at a specific date within 30 days of that submission. The opinion need not be based upon a marine survey, but shall be based on a physical inspection of the vessel. No cause of action shall lie against the declarant on account of the opinion given.

(b) The declaration specified in subdivision (a) is not required if a public agency removes an abandoned vessel, or arranges, by contract, for the removal of the vessel, from a highway or from public or private property.

(1) For lien sale purposes, the public agency which removed the vessel, or arranged for the removal, shall determine if the estimated value of the vessel that has been ordered removed or stored is one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or less.

(2) If the public agency fails or refuses to determine the estimated value of the vessel within three days after the date of removal of the vessel, the lienholder or the lienholder’s agent shall determine, under penalty of perjury, if the estimated value of the vessel that has been ordered removed or stored is one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

507.5.

The proceeds of a vessel lien sale shall be disposed of as follows:

(a) The amount necessary to discharge the lien and the actual cost of selling the vessel shall be paid to the lienholder. Actual cost of sale shall include any fees charged by the department, publication fees, postage and service of notices, whether incurred as a result of a sale or redemption by the registered or legal owner without a sale. The actual cost of sale shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for a vessel without a trailer and one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) for a vessel with a trailer, exclusive of the charges of the department.

(b) The balance, if any, shall be forwarded to the department within 15 days of any sale. Within 30 days thereafter, the department shall send notice of the receipt of the funds, if the amount thereof exceeds ten dollars ($10), to the legal and registered owners at the most current addresses shown in the department’s records.

(c) Any person claiming an interest in the vessel may file a claim with the department for any portion of the funds forwarded to the department pursuant to subdivision (b). Upon determination of the department that the claimant is entitled to a portion of those funds, the department shall pay any entitled amount which does not exceed the balance of the funds remaining on deposit with the department that pertain to the vessel. The department shall not honor any claim unless the claim has been filed within three years of the date the funds were received. At the end of each fiscal year the department shall deposit in the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund all funds held by it for which no claim was filed within the three-year period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 941, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

508.

A lien provided for in this article for repairs, labor, supplies, or materials for, or for storage or safekeeping of, a vessel may be assigned by written instrument accompanied by delivery of possession of the vessel subject to the lien, and the assignee may exercise the rights of a lienholder as provided in this article. A lienholder assigning a lien as authorized in this section shall at the time of assigning the lien give written notice of the assignment either by personal delivery or by certified mail, to the registered and legal owners of the vessel, indicating the name and address of the person to whom the lien is assigned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 345.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

508.5.

All forms required pursuant to this article shall be prescribed by the department. Language used in the notices and declarations shall be simple and nontechnical.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 941, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

509.

No lien shall attach to any personal property in or on the vessel except that which is carried on the vessel for lifesaving, safety, mooring, and operating purposes. Personal property not subject to lien shall be given to the registered owner or the owner’s authorized agent upon demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 941, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Wrecks and Salvage [510. - 571.]



  ARTICLE 1. Wrecks and Wrecked Property [510. - 527.]

510.

The sheriff of each county shall give all possible aid and assistance to vessels stranded on its coast, and to the persons on board. He shall exert himself to save and preserve such persons, vessels, and their cargoes, and all goods and merchandise which may be cast by the sea upon the land, and to this end he may employ as many persons as he may think proper. All citizens shall aid the sheriff when required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

511.

Wrecked property may be kept or reclaimed at the time of the wreck by the owner, consignee, or other person entitled to possession; but if any person has a just claim for salvage and necessary expenses incurred in saving it, the claim shall be paid before the property can be reclaimed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

512.

The sheriff of any county in which any wrecked property is found, when no person entitled to possession appears, shall take possession of it in the name of the people, cause its value to be appraised by disinterested persons, and keep it in some safe place to answer the owner’s claims.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

513.

If wrecked property is in a perishable state, the sheriff shall apply to the judge of the superior court, upon a verified petition, for an order authorizing the sheriff to sell it. If the judge is satisfied that a sale of the property would be beneficial to the persons interested, he or she shall make the order applied for, and the property shall then be sold at public auction, as specified in the order. The proceeds, deducting the expenses of salvage, storage, and sale as settled and allowed by the judge, shall be transmitted to the Treasurer for deposit in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 930, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

514.

If, within 90 days after wrecked property is found, any person claims the property, or its proceeds, and establishes his or her claim by evidence satisfactory to the judge of the superior court, the judge shall make an order directing the officer in whose possession the property or its proceeds may be, to deliver it to the claimant, upon the payment of a reasonable salvage and the necessary expenses of preservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 930, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

515.

Before making the order, the judge shall require from the claimant a bond to the people to be approved by the judge and filed with the clerk of the court, in a penalty double the value of the property or proceeds. The bond shall be conditioned upon the payment of all damages that may be recovered against the claimant or the claimant’s representatives, within three years after its date, by any person establishing title to the property or proceeds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 511.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

516.

If the bond becomes forfeited, the judge of the superior court, upon the application, supported by proof of the person entitled to its benefit shall make an order for its prosecution for such person’s benefit, and at his risk and expense.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

517.

The rejection by the judge of any claim shall not preclude the claimant from maintaining an action against the officer for the recovery of the property or its proceeds. If the plaintiff prevails, there shall be deducted from the damages, in addition to salvage and expenses, all the defendant’s costs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

518.

If, within 60 days after saving wrecked property, no claimant of the property appears, or, if within 60 days after a claim, the salvage and expenses are not paid, or a suit for the recovery of the property is not commenced, the officer who has custody of the property may sell it at public auction and transmit the proceeds of the sale, after deducting salvage, storage, property tax liens, other liens, and other expenses, to the Treasurer for deposit in the General Fund. Deduction of salvage, storage, and other expenses shall not be made, unless the amount has been determined by the superior court of the county. A copy of the order, and the evidence in its support, shall be transmitted by the judge to the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 311, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

519.

Public notice of every sale of wrecked property under the provisions of this article shall be published by the officer making the sale for at least two weeks in succession in one or more newspapers printed in the county, or if none is printed in the county, then by written or printed notices posted in three of the most public places in the county at least fifteen days previous to the sale. Every notice shall state the time and place of the sale and contain a particular description of the property to be sold.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

520.

Every sheriff into whose possession any wrecked property comes, shall forthwith cause to be published for at least two weeks in succession, in one or more of the newspapers printed in this State, a notice directed to all persons interested. The notice shall contain a minute description of the property, and of every bale, box, case, piece, or parcel, and the marks, brands, letters, and figures on each. It shall state:

(a) Where the property then is and its actual condition.

(b) The name, if known, of the vessel from which it came.

(c) The names of its master and super-cargo.

(d) The place where the vessel then is, and its actual condition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

521.

The expense of publishing notices under the provisions of this article is a charge upon the property or proceeds to which it relates.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

522.

(a) Any hulk, derelict, wreck, or parts of any ship, vessel, or other watercraft sunk, beached, or allowed to remain in an unseaworthy or dilapidated condition upon publicly owned submerged lands, salt marsh, or tidelands within the corporate limits of any municipal corporation or other public corporation or entity having jurisdiction or control over those lands, without its consent expressed by resolution of its legislative body, for a period longer than 30 days without a watchman or other person being maintained upon or near and in charge of the property, is abandoned property.

Thereafter, that municipal corporation or other public corporation or entity may, notwithstanding any other provision of law, take title to the abandoned property for purposes of abatement without satisfying any property tax lien on that property, and also may cause the property to be sold, destroyed, or otherwise disposed of in any manner it determines is expedient or convenient. Any property tax lien on the abandoned property shall be satisfied within 30 days following the sale of the abandoned property by a municipal corporation or public entity. Any sale in accordance with this section shall vest complete title in the purchaser who shall forthwith take steps to remove the property. Any proceeds derived from the sale shall be transmitted to the Treasurer for deposit in the General Fund.

(b) However, if the owner of the property securely affixes to the property a notice in plain view setting forth the owner’s name and address and claim of ownership, together with the name and address of an agent or representative whom the owner may designate to act within the State of California if the owner does not reside in the state, and files a copy of the notice with the secretary of the municipal corporation or other public corporation or entity having jurisdiction or control over the lands at least 10 days prior to the removal, the municipal corporation or other public corporation or entity may not sell, destroy, or otherwise dispose of the property until the corporation or entity has first given the owner or the owner’s agent, at the address specified in the claim of ownership, 15 days’ notice to remove or cause the property to be removed, and then only if the property is not removed by the owner or the owner’s agent within that time or reasonable extensions of time as the corporation or entity may grant by resolution. If a registration number appears on the watercraft, the municipal corporation or other public corporation or entity shall send the notice to the last registered owner and the disposition shall be handled as a lien sale under Section 504.

(c) Any municipal corporation or other public corporation may charge a fee to any person who is determined by that municipal or other public corporation to have caused property of a type described in subdivision (a) to become abandoned as described in that subdivision within its corporate limits, in an amount not to exceed the amount of that municipal or other public corporation’s actual and reasonable costs incurred pursuant to this section with respect to the abandoned property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 930, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

523.

(a) A peace officer, as described in Section 663, or a lifeguard or marine safety officer employed by a county, city, or district while engaged in the performance of official duties, may remove a vessel from, and, if necessary, store a vessel removed from, a public waterway under any of the following circumstances:

(1) When the vessel is left unattended and is moored, docked, beached, or made fast to land in a position that obstructs the normal movement of traffic or in a condition that creates a hazard to other vessels using the waterway, to public safety, or to the property of another.

(2) When the vessel is found upon a waterway
 and a report has previously been made that the vessel has been stolen or a complaint has been filed and a warrant thereon issued charging that the vessel has been embezzled.

(3) When the person or persons in charge of the vessel are by reason of physical injuries or illness incapacitated to an extent as to be unable to provide for its custody or removal.

(4) When an officer arrests a person operating or in control of the vessel for an alleged offense, and the officer is, by any provision of this code or other statute, required or permitted to take, and does take, the person arrested before a magistrate without unnecessary delay.

(5) When the vessel interferes with, or otherwise poses a danger to, navigation or to the
 public health, safety, or welfare.

(6) When the vessel poses a threat to adjacent wetlands, levies, sensitive habitat, any protected wildlife species, or water quality.

(7) When a vessel is found or operated upon a waterway with a registration expiration date in excess of one year before the date on which it is found or operated on the waterway.

(b) Costs incurred by a public entity pursuant to removal of vessels under subdivision (a) may be recovered through appropriate action in the courts of this state.

(c) (1) A peace officer, as described in Section 663, or marine safety officer employed by a city, county, or district, while engaged in the
 performance of official duties, may remove a vessel from, and, if necessary, store a vessel removed from, public property within the territorial limits in which the officer may act, in either of the following circumstances:

(A) When any vessel is found upon the public property and the officer has probable cause to believe the vessel was used in the commission of a crime.

(B) When a vessel is found upon public property and an officer has probable cause to believe that the vessel itself provides evidence that a crime was committed or the vessel contains evidence of a possible crime that was committed and the evidence cannot be easily removed from the vessel.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 3068 of the Civil Code, or
 Section 22851 of the Vehicle Code, no lien shall attach to a vessel removed under this subdivision unless it is determined that the vessel was used in the commission of a crime with the express or implied consent of the owner of the vessel.

(3) In any prosecution of a crime for which a vessel was removed and impounded under this subdivision, a court may order a person convicted of a crime involving the use of a vessel to pay the costs of towing and storage of the vessel and any administrative charges imposed in connection with the removal, impoundment, storage, or release of the vessel.

(d) For purposes of this section, “vessel” includes both the vessel and any trailer used by the operator to transport
 the vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 341, Sec. 1.   (AB 2175)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

524.

(a) Any peace officer, as described in Section 663, may store any vessel removed from private property when the vessel is found on, or attached to, private property and a report has previously been made that the vessel has been stolen or a complaint has been filed and a warrant thereon issued charging that the vessel has been embezzled.

(b) Any peace officer, as described in Section 663, may, after a reasonable period of time, remove a vessel from private property if the vessel has been involved in, and left at, the scene of a boating accident and no owner is available to grant permission to remove the vessel. This subdivision does not authorize the removal of a vessel if the owner has been contacted and has refused to grant permission to remove the vessel. 

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to expand the territorial jurisdiction of peace officers beyond the provisions of Sections 830.1 and 830.2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 930, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

525.

(a) Except for the urgent and immediate concern for the safety of those aboard a vessel, a person shall not abandon a vessel upon a public waterway or public or private property without the express or implied consent of the owner or person in lawful possession or control of the property.

(b) The abandonment of a vessel in a manner as provided in subdivision (a) is prima facie evidence that the last registered owner of record, not having notified the appropriate registration or documenting agency of any relinquishment of title or interest therein, is responsible for the abandonment and is thereby liable for the cost of the removal and disposition of the vessel.

(c) A violation of this section is an infraction and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000). In addition, the court may order the defendant to pay to the agency that removes and disposes of the vessel the actual costs incurred by the agency for that removal and disposition.

(d) Fines imposed and collected pursuant to this section shall be allocated as follows:

(1) (A) Eighty percent of the moneys shall be deposited in the Abandoned Watercraft Abatement Fund, which is hereby created as a special fund. Moneys in the fund shall be used exclusively, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants to be awarded by the department to local agencies for the abatement, removal, storage, and disposal as public nuisances of any abandoned property as described in Section 522
 or for the disposal of surrendered vessels as defined in Section 526.1, wrecked or dismantled vessels, or parts thereof, or any other partially submerged objects that pose a substantial hazard to navigation, from navigable waterways or adjacent public property, or private property with the landowner’s consent. These grants shall not be utilized for abatement, removal, storage, or disposal of commercial vessels.

(B) In evaluating a grant request submitted by a local agency pursuant to subparagraph (A), the department shall place great weight on the following two factors:

(i) The existence of an active local enforcement program to control and prevent the abandonment of watercraft within the local agency’s jurisdiction.

(ii) The existence of a submerged navigational hazard abatement plan at the local level that provides
 for the control or abatement of water hazards, including, but not limited to, abandoned watercraft, wrecked watercraft, hazardous floating debris, submerged vessels and objects, and abandoned piers and pilings.

(C) A grant awarded by the department pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be matched by a 10-percent contribution from the local agency receiving the grant.

(D) As a condition of receiving grant funding pursuant to this paragraph, a local agency shall report to the department data, as deemed appropriate by the department, regarding abandoned and surrendered vessels removed or anticipated for removal pursuant to this article.

(2) Twenty percent shall be allocated as set forth in Section 1463.001 of the Penal Code.

(e) The state shall not assume
 liability for any injuries or damages to a person or entity, public or private, connected to or resulting from the processing or disposal of a surrendered vessel, as defined in Section 526.1.

(f) The department may adopt rules and regulations for the purpose of administering this section.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 416, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 204, Sec. 1.   (SB 122)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

525.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2005, the department shall submit recommendations to the Legislature on strategies to prevent recreational vessels from being abandoned and to facilitate the ability of owners to turn in their recreational vessels to public agencies for disposal in lieu of abandonment.

(b) The recommendations shall be based on the expertise and data available to the department in relation to the existing abandoned watercraft abatement program administered by the department.

(c) The recommendations shall consider all of the following:
